Tennessee, session 114, SB1638.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-1-302, is amended by adding the
following new subdivision:
(16) "Tennessee" by Drew Holcomb.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1638
010687
- 1 -